Alabama, session 2026rs, HB423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Goodwill Industries of the Southern
Rivers Incorporated is exempt from paying any state sales and
use taxes.
(b) Any county or municipality may exempt this entity
from the payment of county or municipal sales and use taxes in
accordance with Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 1

accordance with Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB423 INTRODUCED
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 2